Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.090

Disposition forms—Coding.

(1) In all cases where an arrest and fingerprint form is transmitted to the section, the originating agency shall code the form indicating which agency is initially responsible for reporting the disposition to the section. Coding shall include but not be limited to the prosecuting attorney, superior court, district court, municipal court, or the originating agency.

(2) In the case of a superior court or felony disposition, the county clerk or prosecuting attorney shall promptly transmit the completed disposition information to the section. In a county where the judicial information system or other secure method of electronic transfer of information has been implemented between the court and the section, the county clerk shall electronically provide the disposition information. In the case of a felony conviction in a county without the judicial information system or other secure method of electronic transfer of information between the court and the section, the prosecuting attorney shall attach a copy of the judgment and sentence form to the disposition form transmitted to the section. In the case of a lower court disposition, the district or municipal court administrator shall either promptly transmit the completed disposition form or, in a county where the judicial information system or other secure method of electronic transfer of information has been implemented between the court and the section, electronically provide the disposition information to the section. For all other dispositions the originating agency shall promptly transmit the completed disposition form to the section.

[ 1998 c 197 s 1; 1985 c 201 s 4; 1984 c 17 s 9.]